Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Chapter 05. Alaska Banking Code.

Administrative Code. —

For financial institution general administration, see 3 AAC 01.

Collateral references. —

James M.
Koltveit, Accounting for Banks (Matthew Bender).

Ann Graham, Banking Law (Matthew Bender).

Barry S. Zisman, Banks and Thrifts: Government Enforcement and Receivership (Matthew Bender).

Benjamin Geva, Law of Electronic Funds Transfers (Matthew Bender).

Whitley and Norton, Banking Law Manual: Legal Guide to Commercial Banks, Thrift Institutions and Credit Unions (Matthew Bender).

Lender Liability Law and Litigation (Matthew Bender).

Joseph G. Beckford, Bank Holding Co. Compliance Manual (Matthew Bender).

Commercial Loan Documentation Guide (Matthew Bender).

Commercial Finance Guide (Matthew Bender).

Kenneth M. Lapine, Consumer Credit: Laws, Transactions and Forms (Matthew Bender).

Howard Ruda: Asset Based Financing: A transactional Guide (Matthew Bender).

Burton V. McCullough, Letters of Credit (Matthew Bender).

Victor P. Whitney, Trust Department Administration and Operations (Matthew Bender).

Reitman and Weisblatt, Checks, Drafts and Notes (Matthew Bender).